Connecticut, session 2026, SB00493.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 9-225 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The town clerk or assistant town clerk of each town shall warn the
electors [therein] in such town to meet on the Tuesday following the first
Monday in November in the even-numbered years, at six o'clock a.m.,
which warning shall be given by publication (1) in a newspaper having
a general circulation in such town, or towns in the case of a joint
publication under subsection (b) of this section, not more than fifteen
nor less than five days previous to the commencement of the period of
early voting at such election, and (2) on such town's Internet web site,
not more than fifteen nor less than five days previous to the
commencement of the period of early voting at such election. The clerk
in each town shall, in the warning for such election, give notice of (A)
SB493 / File No. 508 1

SB493 File No. 508
the time and the location of each polling place in the town, (B) in towns
divided into voting districts, the time and the location of each polling
place in each district, (C) the time and the site of each location
designated for same-day election registration in the town, and (D) the
time and the site of each location designated for the conduct of early
voting, at which such election will be held. The town clerk shall record
each such warning.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of any charter or home rule
ordinance, the warning under subsection (a) of this section may be
published jointly by two or more towns in a newspaper, provided all
other requirements of this section with respect to such warning are met.
Sec. 2. Section 9-226 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
The warning of each municipal election shall specify the objects for
which such election is to be held. Notice of a town election shall be given
by the town clerk or assistant town clerk, by publishing a warning (1) in
a newspaper published in such town or having a general circulation
[therein] in such town, such publication to be not more than fifteen nor
less than five days previous to the commencement of the period of early
voting at the election, and (2) on such town's Internet web site, such
publication to be not more than fifteen nor less than five days previous
to the commencement of the period of early voting at the election. The
town clerk in each town shall, in the warning for such election, give
notice of (A) the time and the location of each polling place in the town,
(B) in towns divided into voting districts, the time and the location of
each polling place in each district, (C) the time and the site of each
location designated for same-day election registration, and (D) the time
and the site of each location designated for the conduct of early voting,
in the town. The town clerk shall record each such warning. Notice of
an election of a city or borough shall be given by publishing a warning
(i) in a newspaper published within the limits of such city or borough
or having a general circulation [therein] in such city or borough, not
more than fifteen nor less than five days previous to the commencement
SB493 / File No. 508 2

SB493 File No. 508
of the period of early voting at the election, and (ii) on the Internet web
site of such city or borough, or of the town having such city or borough
within such town's limits, not more than fifteen nor less than five days
previous to the commencement of the period of early voting at the
election, which warning shall include notice of (I) the time and the
location of each polling place in such city or borough, (II) in cities and
boroughs divided into voting districts, the time and the location of each
polling place in each district, (III) the time and the site of each location
designated for same-day election registration in such city or borough,
and (IV) the time and the site of each location designated for the conduct
of early voting in such city or borough.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 9-225
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 9-226
GAE Joint Favorable
SB493 / File No. 508 3

SB493 File No. 508
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
This bill makes technical changes to certain statutes on state and
municipal elections, resulting in no fiscal impact to the state or
municipalities.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB493 / File No. 508 4

SB493 File No. 508
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 493
AN ACT MAKING TECHNICAL CHANGES CONCERNING
ELECTIONS.